Utah statutes.
63I-1-231 (Superseded 07/01/14).   Repeal dates, Title 31A.

(1)  Section 31A-2-208.5, Comparison tables, is repealed July 1, 2015.

(2)  Section 31A-2-217, Coordination with other states, is repealed July 1, 2023.



Amended by Chapter 261, 2013 General Session

